Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-628
Children born out of wedlock; birth certificate; issuance; when authorized.

In case of the legitimation of any child born in Nebraska by the subsequent marriage of such child's parents as provided in section 43-1406, the department, upon the receipt of a certified copy of the marriage certificate or abstract of marriage of the parents and a statement of the parents acknowledging paternity, shall prepare a new certificate of birth in the new name of the child so legitimated, in substantially the same form as that used for other live births. The department shall charge and collect the same fee as prescribed in subsection (1) of section 71-612. All such fees shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Health and Human Services Cash Fund. The department shall charge and collect an additional fee of one dollar for each new certificate of birth filed. All amounts collected from such additional fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Child Abuse Prevention Fund.

Laws 1945, c. 173, § 1, p. 552;

Laws 1959, c. 323, § 7, p. 1183;

Laws 1983, LB 617, § 17;

Laws 1986, LB 333, § 12;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 56;

Laws 1994, LB 886, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 83;

Laws 1995, LB 406, § 35;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 160;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 48, § 6;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 60;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 89;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 40;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 434.